Tennessee, session 114, HB1060.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 70-2-106(b)(1), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting instead:
(1) The county clerk of each county or any other person, firm, or corporation
designated and appointed by the executive director as such agent is entitled to collect
from the purchaser of all licenses, permits, stamps, tags, registrations, or other privileges
sold, as specified by the agency, a flat fee of three dollars ($3.00) on any one (1) annual
license, permit, stamp, tag, registration, or other privilege sold, as specified by the
agency, and three dollars ($3.00) on any one (1) license, permit, stamp, tag, registration,
or other privilege, as specified by the agency, which is valid for a specified day or
number of days. Alternatively, the executive director may establish an agent fee,
through competitive bidding contract procedures, for the successful bidder to sell
licenses, permits, stamps, tags, registrations, and other privileges, as specified by the
agency, over the telephone or through other electronic means.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB1060
002065
- 1 -